Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6176.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 4e. (1) Notwithstanding any provision of this act or rule to the contrary, a building or structure that serves as a virtual learning center or a building or structure that contains a virtual learning center must be classified in the business occupancy classification under the code and not in the educational occupancy classification. (2) As used in this section, "virtual learning center" means an organization that provides educational support, counseling, and administrative services for students in grades 9 to 12 who take virtual education courses. A virtual learning center does not provide routine in-person instruction.